Tennessee, session 114, SB1588.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 8, is amended by adding the
following new part:
4-8-501.
There is established a capitol hill protection zone around the state capitol
grounds that includes the state capitol, capitol annexes, War Memorial Building,
Legislative Plaza, Cordell Hull Building, Supreme Court Building, State Library and
Archives Building, John Sevier State Office Building, James K. Polk State Office
Building, William R. Snodgrass Tennessee Tower, and the grounds and roads
immediately surrounding such buildings.
4-8-502.
(a) The commissioner of safety shall ensure that the capitol hill protection zone
is adequately staffed by law enforcement officers to ensure the safety of state
government officials, state government employees, and members of the public. Law
enforcement officers assigned by the commissioner of safety shall have concurrent law
enforcement authority with local law enforcement agencies, including the power to
arrest, carry a firearm, and investigate crime.
(b) The assigned law enforcement officers must be certified by the peace
officers standards and training commission (POST) and may include members of the
SB1588
010249
- 1 -

Tennessee highway patrol, officers from the division of protective services, and state
facility protection officers.
(c) Any officer assigned to the capitol hill protection zone must have completed,
in addition to the training required for POST-certification, training specifically on the laws
regulating protesting on state property and best practices for dealing with large public
gatherings and the protection of government officials.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect January 1, 2027, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010249